Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Capital Construction Projects
§ 21-17-449.
Scope and general construction of W.S. 21-17-402 through 21-17-450.

This act constitutes full authority for the exercise of the incidental powers herein granted concerning the borrowing of money to defray wholly or in part the cost of any project authorized by the legislature appertaining to the university, or to refinance outstanding loans, or both, and the issuance of bonds or other securities to evidence loans or other obligations or to fund or refund outstanding securities, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of securities or the exercise of any other power herein granted that requires an approval, or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts herein authorized to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken under or acts done pursuant to this act, except as herein otherwise provided.

The powers conferred by this act shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this act shall not affect the powers conferred by, any other law.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed as preventing the exercise of any power granted to the board or to the university acting by and through the board, or any officer, agent or employee thereof, by any other law.

No part of this act repeals or affects any other law or part thereof, it being intended that this act shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives and not an exclusive one.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 48; W.S 1957, § 21-444.97; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-449.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-450.
Liberal construction.

This act being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 49; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.98; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-450.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to at the beginning of this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

Severability. —

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 50, provides: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 21-17-451.
Contingent authorization for the university to acquire the national center for atmospheric research supercomputer center facility.

Subject to the terms and conditions of this section, the University of Wyoming board of trustees is authorized to acquire the facility housing the national center for atmospheric research supercomputer center constructed and operated in accordance with the memorandum of understanding and final contract entered into pursuant to 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 136, Section 336. The acquisition may be made by:

Pursuant to subsection (b) of this section notwithstanding W.S. 21-17-408(b), pledging and, as required, using federal mineral royalties distributed to the university pursuant to W.S. 9-4-601(a)(iv) to fund the principal amount and accrued interest remaining to be paid on industrial development revenue bonds issued by Laramie County, Wyoming, and purchased by the state treasurer to fund the construction of the center facility; or

Pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the issuance of revenue bonds under the University Securities Law, W.S.

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

.

Any action taken by the board pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:

All final agreements have been executed for construction and operation of the center as required in 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 136, Section 336(d);

The final agreements in paragraph (i) of this subsection include binding provisions as follows:

If the national science foundation ceases to fund the center on or after July 1, 2019, the national center for atmospheric research shall provide written notice to the University of Wyoming at least one (1) year in advance of the date upon which funding will cease;

If the national science foundation ceases to fund the center as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the university consortium for atmospheric research, which is the parent organization for the national center for atmospheric research, shall transfer ownership of all its interest in the center to the University of Wyoming so that the university holds one hundred percent (100%) ownership interest in the center facility.

If the national science foundation ceases to fund the center as provided in subparagraph (b)(ii)(A) of this section, to the extent the board of trustees determines that the issuance of revenue bonds under the University Securities Law may more economically or otherwise better accomplish the purposes of this section, and no other source of revenue other than the pledge under paragraph (a)(i) of this section has been committed to meet the repayment obligations required by the industrial development revenue bonds, the board may issue its revenue bonds to repay the industrial development revenue bonds if the state treasurer still owns them.

The university shall report any notification from the national center for atmospheric research under subparagraph (b)(ii)(A) of this section to the governor, state treasurer, joint appropriations interim committee and joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee of the legislature.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 112, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 112, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.